Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB457.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7364(a), (b) and (b.1) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7364. Assistance to fire companies and EMS companies.(a) General rule.--The office is authorized, upon application of any fire company or EMS company, to make loans for the following purposes:(1) Establishing or modernizing facilities that house firefighting equipment, ambulance or rescue vehicles. The amount of a loan for establishing or modernizing facilities made to any one fire company or EMS company shall not exceed 50% of the total cost of the facilities or modernization or [$450,000] $750,000, whichever is less, and a notarized financial statement filed under subsection (c) shall show 123456789101112131415161718 that the applicant has available 20% of the total cost of the facilities in unobligated funds. Proceeds of the loan shall be used only for purposes of structure or land acquisition or renovation or construction and shall not be used for payment of fees for design, planning, preparation of applications or any other cost not directly attributable to structure or land acquisition or renovation or construction.(2) Purchasing firefighting apparatus, ambulances or rescue vehicles. The amount of a loan made for purchasing firefighting apparatus to any one fire company shall not exceed [$250,000] $375,000 for any single firefighting apparatus equipment or utility or special service vehicle or heavy duty rescue vehicle as defined by regulation or guideline, or 50% of the total cost of the equipment or vehicle, whichever is less, except for loans for aerial apparatus as defined by regulation or guideline, which shall not exceed [$350,000] $750,000. The amount of a loan made to any one fire company or EMS company for any ambulance or light duty rescue vehicle as defined by regulation or guideline shall not exceed [$125,000] $200,000 and for a watercraft rescue vehicle shall not exceed [$35,000] $75,000 or 50% of the cost of the ambulance or rescue vehicle, whichever is less, and a notarized financial statement filed under subsection (c) shall show that the applicant has available 20% of the total cost of the vehicle in unobligated funds.(3) Purchasing protective, accessory or communication equipment. No fire company or EMS company shall receive a loan for protective, accessory or communicative equipment more than once in any five-year period. Each fire company or 20250SB0457PN0388 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EMS company may apply for a loan for a mobile and portable radio unit for each existing serviceable apparatus equipment, ambulance or rescue vehicle. Radio equipment obtained through loans under this subchapter shall be equipped with a frequency or frequencies licensed by the Federal Communications Commission for firefighting or emergency response purposes. Protective equipment obtained through loans under this subchapter must meet standards adopted by the commissioner to ensure that the protective equipment does not contain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. A notarized financial statement shall be filed and loans under this subchapter for the purchase of protective, accessory or communicative equipment shall not exceed [$25,000] $75,000.(4) Refinancing debt incurred or contracts entered into after November 4, 1975, and used for the purchase of apparatus equipment or for the construction or modernization of facilities or for modification of apparatus equipment in order to comply with National Fire Protection Association standards.(5) Repair or rehabilitation of apparatus equipment. Where it has been determined that existing apparatus equipment no longer meets the standards of the National Fire Protection Association and the repair or rehabilitation of such equipment will bring it in compliance with National Fire Protection Association standards, loans for the repair or rehabilitation for a single apparatus equipment shall be for at least $3,000 but shall not exceed the lesser of [$80,000] $150,000 or 80% of the total cost of repair or rehabilitation.(6) Purchasing of used firefighting apparatus, 20250SB0457PN0388 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment, used ambulances, used rescue vehicles, used communications equipment, used accessory equipment or used protective equipment, except that the used vehicles and equipment shall meet the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) standards and loans for the purchase of a used single apparatus equipment shall not exceed [$200,000] $300,000 or 80% of the total cost of the equipment, whichever is less.* * *(b) Loans.--Loans made by the office in the amount of $50,000 or less shall be for a period of not more than ten years. Loans in excess of $50,000 but not in excess of $300,000 shall be for a period of not more than [15] 20 years. The payback period of any loan in excess of $300,000 shall not exceed [20] 30 years. Loans shall be subject to the payment of interest at 2% per year and shall be subject to such security as shall be determined by the commissioner. The total amount of interest earned by the investment or reinvestment of all or any part of the principal of any loan shall be returned to the office and transferred to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund and shall not be credited as payment of principal or interest on the loan. Except as provided in subsection (a)(5) and (7), the minimum amount of any loan shall be $25,000.(b.1) Inflation adjustment.--Beginning [one year after the effective date of this subsection and biannually] January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, all loan limits under this section shall increase at the rate of inflation as outlined in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Philadelphia-Camden-Wilmington, PA-NJ-DE-MD area for the most recent 12-month period for which the figures have been reported 20250SB0457PN0388 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the rate of inflation does not increase, all loan limits shall remain the same as they were for the previous year. The office shall transmit notice of loan limit increases to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0457PN0388 - 5 - 12345678